Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2659
Aerial pesticide business; records.

Each aerial pesticide
business shall maintain records of applications of pesticides by use of an
aircraft that are required by the department, and the department may require
such records to be kept separate from other business records. The department
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the information to
be included in the records. The aerial pesticide business shall keep such
records for a period of at least three years, provide the department with
access to examine such records, and provide the department a copy of any such
record upon request.

Laws 2010, LB254, § 6.